District of Columbia statutes.
3-1337

Repealed

Exemption from District income tax.

Repealed.

July 25, 1989, D.C. Law 8-17, § 3, 36 DCR 4160
1981 Ed., § 2-2537.
Application of Law 8-17: Section 12 of D.C. Law 8-17 provided that § 2(a), (b) and (c) and 3 shall apply to all taxable years beginning after December 31, 1988. Section 2(d) and (e) shall apply to all taxable periods beginning after September 30, 1989. All other sections of the act shall apply as of July 1, 1989.